Utah statutes.
38-1-8.   Liens on several separate properties in one claim.
Liens against two or more buildings or other improvements owned by the same
person may be included in one claim; but in such case the person filing the
claim must designate the amount claimed to be due to him on each of such
buildings or other improvements.
